Hawaii statutes.
§571-51 Support of minor committed for
study or care. Whenever legal custody of a minor is given by the court to
someone other than the minor's parents, or when a minor is given medical,
psychological, or psychiatric study or treatment under order of the court, and
no provision is otherwise made by law for the support of the minor or for
payment for such treatment, compensation for the study and treatment of the
minor, when approved by order of the court, shall, if necessary, be paid out of
such moneys as may be appropriated for the expenses of the court. After giving
the parent a reasonable opportunity to be heard, the court may order and decree
that the parent shall pay, in such manner as the court may direct, a reasonable
sum that will cover in whole or in part the support and treatment of the minor
given after the decree is entered. If the parent wilfully fails or refuses to
pay such sum, the court may proceed against the parent as for contempt, or the
order may be filed and shall have the effect of a civil judgment.

Compensation may be made to a nongovernmental
agency, provided that it shall make periodic reports to the court or to an
agency designated by the court concerning the care and treatment the minor is
receiving and the minor's response to such treatment. These reports shall be
made as frequently as the court deems necessary and shall be made with respect
to every such minor at intervals not exceeding six months. The agency shall
also afford an opportunity for a representative of the court or of an agency
designated by the court to visit, examine, or consult with the minor as
frequently as the court deems necessary. [L 1965, c 232, pt of §1; Supp,
§333-27; HRS §571-51; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next